Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-105.01
Rules; conformance by sheriff or jail administrator.

The sheriff or such other person as may be charged with the administration of the jail shall conform to the rules and directions as prescribed by the Jail Standards Board pursuant to sections 47-101 and 47-104 which may be made and communicated to him or her by the county board.

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 6.